Georgia, session 2025_26, SB152.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 2B of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to promise
scholarship accounts, is amended in Code Section 20-2B-5, relating to powers of the
education savings authority, by revising subsection (b) and by adding a new subsection to
read as follows:
"(b) Pursuant Except as provided in subsection (d) of this Code section, pursuant to Code
Section 50-18-70, the education savings authority shall not disclose and shall keep
confidential, in each case unless identifying information has been redacted:
S. B. 152
- 1 -

LC 49 2264S (SCS)
(1) Records that include information identifying a student or former student by name,
address except for ZIP Code, telephone number, or emergency contact; and
(2) Records that reveal an individual's social security number, mother's birth name, credit
card information, debit card information, bank account information, account number,
utility account number, password used to access his or her account, financial data or
information, insurance or medical information in all records, unlisted telephone number
if so designated in a public record, personal email address or cellular telephone number,
or month and day of birth."
"(d) As necessary to enforce the provisions of this chapter, the education savings authority
or its duly authorized agents may submit to the state revenue commissioner the names of
applicants for promise scholarship accounts or account funds or other benefits or payments
provided under this chapter, as well as the relevant income threshold specified therein. If
the education savings authority elects to contract with the state revenue commissioner for
such purposes, the state revenue commissioner and his or her agents or employees shall
notify the education savings authority whether each submitted applicant's income exceeds
the relevant income threshold provided. The education savings authority shall pay the state
revenue commissioner for all costs incurred by the Department of Revenue pursuant to this
subsection. No information shall be provided by the Department of Revenue to the
education savings authority without an executed cooperative agreement between the two
entities. Any tax information secured from the federal government by the Department of
Revenue pursuant to express provisions of Section 6103 of the Internal Revenue Code may
not be disclosed by the Department of Revenue pursuant to this subsection. Any person
receiving any tax information under the authority of this subsection is subject to the
provisions of Code Section 48-7-60 and to all penalties provided under Code Section
48-7-61 for unlawful divulging of confidential tax information."
S. B. 152
- 2 -

LC 49 2264S (SCS)
SECTION 2.
Said chapter is further amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"20-2B-22.1.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Biological or adopted child' means a child who is the biological issue of an
individual or who has been adopted by an individual pursuant to a decree of adoption by
a court of this state or by a court of any other jurisdiction.
(2) 'Foster parent' means an individual who currently provides or, at any time during the
preceding ten years, has provided care, lodging, supervision, and maintenance for one or
more children in a foster care home used by an agency licensed as a child-placing agency
pursuant to Chapter 5 of Title 49 or in a foster care home approved and directly
supervised by the Department of Human Services.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of Code Section 20-2B-22 to the contrary, each student
who has reached the age of four years but has not reached the age of 20 years, who is the
biological or adopted child of an individual who is a foster parent, and who meets the
requirements of paragraphs (1), (4), (6), (7), (8), and (9) of subsection (a) of Code Section
20-2B-22 shall qualify for a promise scholarship account under this article."
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 152
- 3 -